North Carolina statutes. Chapter 132. Public Records.
§ 132-1.
“Public records” defined.

“Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps, books, photographs, films, sound recordings, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data-processing records, artifacts, or other documentary material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, made or received pursuant to law or ordinance in connection with the transaction of public business by any agency of North Carolina government or its subdivisions. Agency of North Carolina government or its subdivisions shall mean and include every public office, public officer or official (State or local, elected or appointed), institution, board, commission, bureau, council, department, authority or other unit of government of the State or of any county, unit, special district or other political subdivision of government.

The public records and public information compiled by the agencies of North Carolina government or its subdivisions are the property of the people. Therefore, it is the policy of this State that the people may obtain copies of their public records and public information free or at minimal cost unless otherwise specifically provided by law. As used herein, “minimal cost” shall mean the actual cost of reproducing the public record or public information.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 1; 1975, c. 787, s. 1; 1995, c. 388, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Alamance: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 950, s. 1(c); Ashe:
1991, c. 163, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(dd); Caldwell: 1987, c. 472, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(s); Cleveland:
1989, c. 173, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(aa); Cumberland: 1993, ch. 413, s. 5; Davidson:
1993, c. 453, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(ii); Davie: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 928, s. 1(c); Gaston: 1987, c. 618, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(w); Guilford:
1993, c. 82, s. 1;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; Hertford: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 979, s. 1(c); Hyde:
1991, c. 230, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(ee); Lee: 1987, c. 538, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(u); Lenoir: 1987, c. 561, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(v); Lincoln:
1993, c. 549, s. 1, as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(jj); Mecklenburg:
1993, c. 82, s. 1;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; Mitchell: 1987, c. 141, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(m); Nash: 1987, c. 32;
1993, c. 82, s. 1; 1993, c. 545;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; New Hanover:
1995, c. 432, s. 1; (As to Chapter 132) Onslow:
2013-37, s. 1(i); Pender: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 970, s. 1(c) (repealed by
2001-439, s. 6.1, on effective date of a tax levied under the 2001 act); Pitt: 1987, c. 143, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(n);
1993, c. 82, s. 1; 1993, ch. 410, s. 1;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; Rutherford:
1991, c. 577, s. 5(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(gg); Wake:
1991, c. 594, s. 9, as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(hh);
1995, c. 458, s. 5; Washington: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 821; Yancey: 1987, c. 140, s. 1(c), as amended by
2007-527, s. 21(
l
); city of Albemarle: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 915 (repealed on effective date of a tax levied under
2001-434, ss. 6, 7, by the County of Stanly); (As to Chapter 132) city of Charlotte:
2000-26, s. 1, as amended by
2007-255, s.1; city of Conover: 1987, c. 319, s. 1; city of Greensboro: 1987, c. 51;
1989, c. 383, s. 1;
1993, c. 82, s. 1;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; city of Hickory: 1987, c. 319, s. 1; city of High Point:
1993, c. 82, s. 1;
1995, c. 432, s. 1; city of Kinston: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 648, s. 1(c), as amended by Session Laws
2007-527, s. 21(

ll

); (As to Chapter 132) city of Rocky Mount: 2003-327, as amended by 2009-74; city of Thomasville:
1993, c. 453, s. 1(c); city of Wilmington:
1995, c. 432, s. 1; town of Blowing Rock: 1987, c. 171, s. 1(c); town of Cary: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 874, s. 1(c); town of Columbus:
1991, c. 632, s. 1(c); town of Garner:
1989, c. 660, s. 1(c); town of Hillsborough:
1993, c. 449, s. 1(e); town of Oriental: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 695, s. 1(c); town of Wake Forest:
1989, c. 604, s. 1(c); Averasboro Township: 1987, c. 142; village of Bald Head Island:
1991, c. 664, s. 2(c).

Cross References.

For the Address Confidentiality Program, see

G.S. 15C-1

et seq.

As to the use and confidential nature of actual addresses of Address Confidentiality Program participants by boards of elections for election-related purposes, see

G.S. 15C-8

.

For requirements regarding marking and issuance of license plates for publicly owned vehicles, see

G.S. 20-39.1

.

For provision that the report and affidavit required by

G.S. 58-21-35

are not public records under this section, see

G.S. 58-21-35

.

For provision that records, papers, and other documents containing information collected and compiled by the Board of Law Examiners or its members or employees as a result of investigations, inquiries, or interviews conducted in connection with examinations or licensing matters, are not public records within the meaning of this Chapter, see

G.S. 84-24

.

As to records of education agencies, see

G.S. 115C-3

.

As to diaries kept in connection with construction or repair contracts, see G.S. 136-28.5.

As to Government Data Analytics Center and release of information relating to the data integration and data-sharing initiative, see G.S. 143B-1385.

§ 132-1.1.
Confidential communications by legal counsel to public board or agency; State tax information; public enterprise billing information; Address Confidentiality Program information.

Confidential Communications. — Public records, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, shall not include written communications (and copies thereof) to any public board, council, commission or other governmental body of the State or of any county, municipality or other political subdivision or unit of government, made within the scope of the attorney-client relationship by any attorney-at-law serving any such governmental body, concerning any claim against or on behalf of the governmental body or the governmental entity for which such body acts, or concerning the prosecution, defense, settlement or litigation of any judicial action, or any administrative or other type of proceeding to which the governmental body is a party or by which it is or may be directly affected. Such written communication and copies thereof shall not be open to public inspection, examination or copying unless specifically made public by the governmental body receiving such written communications; provided, however, that such written communications and copies thereof shall become public records as defined in

G.S. 132-1

three years from the date such communication was received by such public board, council, commission or other governmental body.

State and Local Tax Information. — Tax information may not be disclosed except as provided in

G.S. 105-259

. As used in this subsection, “tax information” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 105-259

. Local tax records that contain information about a taxpayer’s income or receipts may not be disclosed except as provided in

G.S. 153A-148.1

and

G.S. 160A-208.1

.

Public Enterprise Billing Information. — Billing information compiled and maintained by a city or county or other public entity providing utility services in connection with the ownership or operation of a public enterprise, excluding airports, is not a public record as defined in

G.S. 132-1

. Nothing contained herein is intended to limit public disclosure by a city or county of billing information:

That the city or county determines will be useful or necessary to assist bond counsel, bond underwriters, underwriters’ counsel, rating agencies or investors or potential investors in making informed decisions regarding bonds or other obligations incurred or to be incurred with respect to the public enterprise;

That is necessary to assist the city, county, State, or public enterprise to maintain the integrity and quality of services it provides; or

That is necessary to assist law enforcement, public safety, fire protection, rescue, emergency management, or judicial officers in the performance of their duties.As used herein, “billing information” means any record or information, in whatever form, compiled or maintained with respect to individual customers by any owner or operator of a public enterprise, as defined in

G.S. 160A-311

, excluding subdivision (9), and

G.S. 153A-274

, excluding subdivision (4), or other public entity providing utility services, excluding airports, relating to services it provides or will provide to the customer.

Address Confidentiality Program Information. — The actual address and telephone number of a program participant in the Address Confidentiality Program established under Chapter 15C of the General Statutes is not a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132. The actual address and telephone number of a program participant may not be disclosed except as provided in Chapter 15C of the General Statutes.

Controlled Substances Reporting System Information. — Information compiled or maintained in the Controlled Substances Reporting System established under Article 5E of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is not a public record as defined in

G.S. 132-1

and may be released only as provided under Article 5E of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Personally Identifiable Admissions Information. — Records maintained by The University of North Carolina or any constituent institution, or by the Community Colleges System Office or any community college, which contain personally identifiable information from or about an applicant for admission to one or more constituent institutions or to one or more community colleges shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to G.S. 132-6(a). Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, any letter of recommendation or record containing a communication from an elected official to The University of North Carolina, any of its constituent institutions, or to a community college, concerning an applicant for admission who has not enrolled as a student shall be considered a public record subject to disclosure pursuant to G.S. 132-6(a). Nothing in this subsection is intended to limit the disclosure of public records that do not contain personally identifiable information, including aggregated data, guidelines, instructions, summaries, or reports that do not contain personally identifiable information or from which it is feasible to redact any personally identifiable information that the record contains. As used in this subsection, the term “community college” is as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, the term “constituent institution” is as defined in

G.S. 116-2(4)

, and the term “Community Colleges System Office” is as defined in

G.S. 115D-3

.

Public Agency Proprietary Computer Code. — Proprietary computer code written by and for use by an agency of North Carolina government or its subdivisions is not a public record as defined in

G.S. 132-1

.

Employment Security Information. — Confidential information obtained, compiled, or maintained by the Division of Employment Security may not be disclosed except as provided in G.S. 96-4. As used in this subsection, the term “confidential information” has the same meaning as in G.S. 96-4(x).

History.

1975, c. 662; 1993, c. 485, s. 38; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, s. 21; 2001-473, s. 1; 2002-171, s. 7; 2003-287, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 10.36(b); 2007-372, s. 2; 2013-96, s. 1; 2014-117, s. 2.

Cross References.

For the Address Confidentiality Program, see

G.S. 15C-1

et seq.

§ 132-1.2.
Confidential information.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require or authorize a public agency or its subdivision to disclose any information that:

Meets all of the following conditions:

Constitutes a “trade secret” as defined in G.S. 66-152(3).

Is the property of a private “person” as defined in G.S. 66-152(2).

Is disclosed or furnished to the public agency in connection with the owner’s performance of a public contract or in connection with a bid, application, proposal, industrial development project, or in compliance with laws, regulations, rules, or ordinances of the United States, the State, or political subdivisions of the State.

Is designated or indicated as “confidential” or as a “trade secret” at the time of its initial disclosure to the public agency.

Reveals an account number for electronic payment as defined in

G.S. 147-86.20

and obtained pursuant to Articles 6A or 6B of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes or

G.S. 159-32.1

.

Reveals a document, file number, password, or any other information maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

Reveals the electronically captured image of an individual’s signature, date of birth, drivers license number, or a portion of an individual’s social security number if the agency has those items because they are on a voter registration document.

Reveals the seal of a licensed design professional who is licensed under Chapter 83A or Chapter 89C of the General Statutes that has been submitted for project approval to (i) a municipality under Part 5 of Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or (ii) to a county under Part 4 of Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes. Notwithstanding this exemption, a municipality or county that receives a request for a document submitted for project approval that contains the seal of a licensed design professional who is licensed under Chapter 83A or Chapter 89C of the General Statutes and that is otherwise a public record by

G.S. 132-1

shall allow a copy of the document without the seal of the licensed design professional to be examined and copied, consistent with any rules adopted by the licensing board under Chapter 83A or Chapter 89C of the General Statutes regarding an unsealed document.

Reveals documents related to the federal government’s process to determine closure or realignment of military installations until a final decision has been made by the federal government in that process.

Reveals name, address, qualifications, and other identifying information of any person or entity that manufactures, compounds, prepares, prescribes, dispenses, supplies, or administers the drugs or supplies obtained for any purpose authorized by Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes.

Reveals the name, address, or other identifying information of any individual winning more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in a lottery game who requests to remain anonymous for 90 days, as provided in G.S. 18C-132(j1).

Reveals proprietary design work or work product included in a proposal that is submitted to the Department of Transportation for consideration, or any Department intra-agency communications related to the review of a proposal, during a competitive bid process. For the purposes of this subdivision, the competitive bid process is completed upon contract award. Proprietary design work, work product, or intra-agency communications that are otherwise public records pursuant to

G.S. 132-1

are no longer confidential and subject to disclosure upon contract award.

History.

1989, c. 269; 1991, c. 745, s. 3; 1999-434, s. 7; 2001-455, s. 2; 2001-513, s. 30(b); 2003-226, s. 5; 2004-127, s. 17(b); 2009-346, s. 1; 2014-79, s. 8; 2015-198, s. 6; 2019-142, s. 6; 2019-156, s. 3.

§ 132-1.3.
Settlements made by or on behalf of public agencies, public officials, or public employees; public records.

Public records, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, shall include all settlement documents in any suit, administrative proceeding or arbitration instituted against any agency of North Carolina government or its subdivisions, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, in connection with or arising out of such agency’s official actions, duties or responsibilities, except in an action for medical malpractice against a hospital facility. No agency of North Carolina government or its subdivisions, nor any counsel, insurance company or other representative acting on behalf of such agency, shall approve, accept or enter into any settlement of any such suit, arbitration or proceeding if the settlement provides that its terms and conditions shall be confidential, except in an action for medical malpractice against a hospital facility. No settlement document sealed under subsection (b) of this section shall be open for public inspection.

No judge, administrative judge or administrative hearing officer of this State, nor any board or commission, nor any arbitrator appointed pursuant to the laws of North Carolina, shall order or permit the sealing of any settlement document in any proceeding described herein except on the basis of a written order concluding that (1) the presumption of openness is overcome by an overriding interest and (2) that such overriding interest cannot be protected by any measure short of sealing the settlement. Such order shall articulate the overriding interest and shall include findings of fact that are sufficiently specific to permit a reviewing court to determine whether the order was proper.

Except for confidential communications as provided in

G.S. 132-1.1

, the term “settlement documents,” as used herein, shall include all documents which reflect, or which are made or utilized in connection with, the terms and conditions upon which any proceedings described in this section are compromised, settled, terminated or dismissed, including but not limited to correspondence, settlement agreements, consent orders, checks, and bank drafts.

History.

1989, c. 326.

§ 132-1.3A.
The University of North Carolina athletic conference communications and other documentary materials; public records.

Public records, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, shall include all documents, papers, letters, photographs, films, sound recordings, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data-processing records, artifacts, or other documentary material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, in the possession of The University of North Carolina or any of its constituent institutions related to membership in or communication with the National Collegiate Athletic Association (NCAA), the Atlantic Coast Conference or any other athletic conference in any division of the NCAA, or any other collegiate sports association or organization.

History.

2017-175, s. 1.

§ 132-1.4.
Criminal investigations; intelligence information records; Innocence Inquiry Commission records.

Records of criminal investigations conducted by public law enforcement agencies, records of criminal intelligence information compiled by public law enforcement agencies, and records of investigations conducted by the North Carolina Innocence Inquiry Commission, are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

. Records of criminal investigations conducted by public law enforcement agencies or records of criminal intelligence information may be released by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

As used in this section:

“Records of criminal investigations” means all records or any information that pertains to a person or group of persons that is compiled by public law enforcement agencies for the purpose of attempting to prevent or solve violations of the law, including information derived from witnesses, laboratory tests, surveillance, investigators, confidential informants, photographs, and measurements. The term also includes any records, worksheets, reports, or analyses prepared or conducted by the North Carolina State Crime Laboratory at the request of any public law enforcement agency in connection with a criminal investigation.

“Records of criminal intelligence information” means records or information that pertain to a person or group of persons that is compiled by a public law enforcement agency in an effort to anticipate, prevent, or monitor possible violations of the law.

“Public law enforcement agency” means a municipal police department, a county police department, a sheriff’s office, a company police agency commissioned by the Attorney General pursuant to

G.S. 74E-1

, et seq., and any State or local agency, force, department, or unit responsible for investigating, preventing, or solving violations of the law.

“Violations of the law” means crimes and offenses that are prosecutable in the criminal courts in this State or the United States and infractions as defined in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

“Complaining witness” means an alleged victim or other person who reports a violation or apparent violation of the law to a public law enforcement agency.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, and unless otherwise prohibited by law, the following information shall be public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

.

The time, date, location, and nature of a violation or apparent violation of the law reported to a public law enforcement agency.

The name, sex, age, address, employment, and alleged violation of law of a person arrested, charged, or indicted.

The circumstances surrounding an arrest, including the time and place of the arrest, whether the arrest involved resistance, possession or use of weapons, or pursuit, and a description of any items seized in connection with the arrest.

The contents of “911” and other emergency telephone calls received by or on behalf of public law enforcement agencies, except for such contents that reveal the natural voice, name, address, telephone number, or other information that may identify the caller, victim, or witness. In order to protect the identity of the complaining witness, the contents of “911” and other emergency telephone calls may be released pursuant to this section in the form of a written transcript or altered voice reproduction; provided that the original shall be provided under process to be used as evidence in any relevant civil or criminal proceeding.

The contents of communications between or among employees of public law enforcement agencies that are broadcast over the public airways.

The name, sex, age, and address of a complaining witness.

A public law enforcement agency shall temporarily withhold the name or address of a complaining witness if release of the information is reasonably likely to pose a threat to the mental health, physical health, or personal safety of the complaining witness or materially compromise a continuing or future criminal investigation or criminal intelligence operation. Information temporarily withheld under this subsection shall be made available for release to the public in accordance with

G.S. 132-6

as soon as the circumstances that justify withholding it cease to exist. Any person denied access to information withheld under this subsection may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order compelling disclosure of the information. In such action, the court shall balance the interests of the public in disclosure against the interests of the law enforcement agency and the alleged victim in withholding the information. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set down for immediate hearing, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

If a public law enforcement agency believes that release of information that is a public record under subdivisions (c)(1) through (c)(5) of this section will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant to receive a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation, it may seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction to prevent disclosure of the information. In such action the law enforcement agency shall have the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that disclosure of the information in question will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant to receive a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set down for immediate hearing, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any public law enforcement agency to prohibit or prevent another public agency having custody of a public record from permitting the inspection, examination, or copying of such public record in compliance with

G.S. 132-6

. The use of a public record in connection with a criminal investigation or the gathering of criminal intelligence shall not affect its status as a public record.

Disclosure of records of criminal investigations and criminal intelligence information that have been transmitted to a district attorney or other attorney authorized to prosecute a violation of law shall be governed by this section and Chapter 15A of the General Statutes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring law enforcement agencies to disclose the following:

Information that would not be required to be disclosed under Chapter 15A of the General Statutes; or

Information that is reasonably likely to identify a confidential informant.

Law enforcement agencies shall not be required to maintain any tape recordings of “911” or other communications for more than 30 days from the time of the call, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders a portion sealed.

When information that is not a public record under the provisions of this section is deleted from a document, tape recording, or other record, the law enforcement agency shall make clear that a deletion has been made. Nothing in this subsection shall authorize the destruction of the original record.

The following court records are public records and may be withheld only when sealed by court order: arrest and search warrants that have been returned by law enforcement agencies, indictments, criminal summons, and nontestimonial identification orders.

Records of investigations of alleged child abuse shall be governed by Article 29 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

History.

1993, c. 461, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 13(jj); 2006-184, s. 7; 2010-171, s. 5; 2011-321, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 17.6(o); 2021-182, s. 3(i).